Utah statutes.
15-9-113.   Required records.

(1)  An athlete agent shall retain the following records for a period of five years:

(a)  the name and address of each individual represented by the athlete agent;

(b)  any agency contract entered into by the athlete agent; and

(c)  any direct costs incurred by the athlete agent in the recruitment or solicitation of a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract.

(2)  Records required by Subsection (1) to be retained are open to inspection by the division during normal business hours.

